Utah statutes.
53C-1-305.   Attorney general to represent administration.
(1)  The attorney general shall:
(a)  represent the board, director, or administration in any legal action
relating to trust lands except as otherwise provided in Subsection (3);
(b)  review leases, contracts, and agreements submitted for review prior to
execution; and
(c)  undertake suits for the collection of royalties, rental, and other
damages in the name of the state.
(2)  The attorney general may institute actions against any party to enforce
this title or to protect the interests of the trust beneficiaries.
(3)  The administration may, with the consent of the attorney general, employ
in house legal counsel to perform the duties of the attorney general under
Subsections (1) and (2).
(4)  In those instances where the interests of the trust beneficiaries
conflict with those of state officers or executive department agencies for
which the attorney general acts as legal advisor under Utah Constitution
Article VII, Section 16, the board may, with the consent of the attorney
general, employ independent counsel to represent and protect those interests.
